Indiana, session 2026, HB1312.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-2-2.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) This section applies to every crime in
which proof that a person has a prior conviction or judgment for an
infraction increases:
(1) the class or level of the crime;
(2) the penalty for the crime from a misdemeanor to a felony; or
(3) the penalty for an infraction to a misdemeanor or felony.
(b) This section does not apply to a sentencing provision that
increases the penalty that may be imposed for an infraction or crime
but does not increase:
(1) the class or level of the crime;
(2) the penalty for the crime from a misdemeanor to a felony; or
(3) the penalty for an infraction to a misdemeanor or felony;
including IC 35-50-2-8 (habitual offenders), IC 35-50-2-9 and
IC 35-50-2-9.5 (death penalty sentencing), IC 9-30-15.5 (habitual
vehicular substance offender), and IC 35-50-2-14 (repeat sexual
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151


offender).
(c) This section does not apply to a crime that contains a specific
lookback period for a prior conviction or judgment for an infraction.
(d) Subject to subsection (e), and except as provided in subsection
(f), a prior conviction or a prior judgment for an infraction increases the
class or level of the crime, the penalty for the crime from a
misdemeanor to a felony, or the penalty for an infraction to a
misdemeanor or felony only if the current crime was committed not
later than twelve (12) years from the date the defendant was:
(1) convicted of the prior crime, if the defendant was not
sentenced to a term of incarceration or probation;
(2) adjudicated to have committed the infraction; or
(3) released from a term of incarceration, probation, or parole
(whichever occurs later) imposed for the prior conviction;
whichever occurred last.
(e) If a crime described in subsection (a) requires proof of more than
one (1) criminal conviction or judgment for an infraction, the increased
penalty applies only if the current crime was committed not later than
twelve (12) years from the date the defendant was:
(1) convicted of one (1) of the prior crimes, if the person was not
sentenced to a term of incarceration or probation;
(2) adjudicated to have committed one (1) of the infractions; or
(3) released from a term of incarceration, probation, or parole
(whichever occurs later) imposed for one (1) of the prior
convictions;
whichever occurred last.
(f) This section does not apply if the crime described in subsection
(a) is one (1) or more of the following:
(1) A crime of violence (as defined by IC 35-50-1-2).
(2) A crime that results in bodily injury or death to a victim.
(3) A sex offense (as defined by IC 11-8-8-5.2).
(4) Domestic battery (IC 35-42-2-1.3).
(5) Strangulation (IC 35-42-2-9).
(6) Operating while intoxicated with a prior conviction for
operating while intoxicated that resulted in death, serious bodily
injury, or catastrophic injury (IC 9-30-5-3(b)).
(7) Dealing in cocaine or a narcotic drug (IC 35-48-4-1).
(8) Dealing in methamphetamine (IC 35-48-4-1.1).
(9) Manufacturing methamphetamine (IC 35-48-4-1.2).
(10) Dealing in a schedule I, II, or III controlled substance (IC
35-48-4-2).
(g) If there is a conflict between a provision in this section and
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151


another provision of the Indiana Code, this section controls.
SECTION 2. IC 33-40-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.161-2025,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The commission shall do the following:
(1) Make recommendations to the supreme court concerning
standards for indigent defense services provided for defendants
against whom the state has sought the death sentence under
IC 35-50-2-9 or IC 35-50-2-9.5, including the following:
(A) Determining indigency and eligibility for legal
representation.
(B) Selection and qualifications of attorneys to represent
indigent defendants at public expense.
(C) Determining conflicts of interest.
(D) Investigative, clerical, and other support services
necessary to provide adequate legal representation.
(2) Adopt guidelines and standards for indigent defense services
under which the counties will be eligible for reimbursement under
IC 33-40-6, including the following:
(A) Determining indigency and the eligibility for legal
representation.
(B) The issuance and enforcement of orders requiring the
defendant to pay for the costs of court appointed legal
representation under IC 33-40-3.
(C) The use and expenditure of funds in the county
supplemental public defender services fund established under
IC 33-40-3-1.
(D) Qualifications of attorneys to represent indigent
defendants at public expense.
(E) Compensation rates for salaried, contractual, and assigned
counsel.
(F) Minimum and maximum caseloads of public defender
offices and contract attorneys.
(G) Requirements concerning the creation and operation of a
multicounty public defender's office created under an
interlocal agreement as described in IC 33-40-7-3.5.
(3) Make recommendations concerning the delivery of indigent
defense services in Indiana, including the funding and delivery of
indigent defense services for juveniles.
(4) Make an annual report to the governor, the general assembly,
and the supreme court on the operation of the public defense fund.
(5) Make a report not later than December 1, 2029, to the
legislative council and the budget committee concerning the up
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151


to forty percent (40%) reimbursement from the public defense
fund for indigent defense services for misdemeanor cases under
IC 33-40-6-4(d), IC 33-40-6-5(c), and IC 33-40-7-11(d).
(6) On or before July 1, 2031, and July 1 biennially thereafter, the
commission shall submit a report to the executive director of the
legislative services agency, in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6, for review by the interim committee on government in
accordance with IC 1-1-15.5-4 and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g). The report
shall describe:
(A) official action taken; and
(B) actionable items considered;
by the commission during the preceding two (2) years.
(b) The commission must provide data and statistics concerning
how the reimbursement has impacted attorney appointment rates, jail
population, trial rates, and case outcomes in the report under subsection
(a)(5).
(c) The report to the general assembly under subsection (a)(4) and
to the legislative council under subsection (a)(5) must be in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(d) The commission shall not:
(1) receive any additional appropriations from the general
assembly for misdemeanor reimbursement; or
(2) reimburse a county other than a county described in
IC 33-40-6-4(d) for misdemeanor reimbursement;
before July 1, 2029
SECTION 3. IC 33-40-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2024,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"county auditor" includes a person who:
(1) is the auditor of a county that is a member of a multicounty
public defender's office; and
(2) is responsible for the receipt, disbursement, and accounting of
all monies distributed to the multicounty public defender's office.
(b) A county auditor may submit on a quarterly basis a certified
request to the Indiana commission on court appointed attorneys for
reimbursement from the public defense fund for an amount equal to
fifty percent (50%) of the county's expenditures for indigent defense
services provided to a defendant against whom the death sentence is
sought under IC 35-50-2-9 or IC 35-50-2-9.5.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), a county auditor may
submit on a quarterly basis a certified request to the Indiana
commission on court appointed attorneys for reimbursement from the
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151


public defense fund for an amount equal to forty percent (40%) of the
county's or multicounty public defender's office's expenditures for
indigent defense services provided in all noncapital cases except
misdemeanors.
(d) This subsection applies to a county that is one (1) of up to twelve
(12) counties that shall be selected by the Indiana commission on court
appointed attorneys based on population and geographic diversity. A
county auditor may submit on a quarterly basis a certified request to the
Indiana commission on court appointed attorneys for reimbursement
from the public defense fund for an amount that is up to forty percent
(40%) of the county's or multicounty public defender's office's
expenditures for indigent defense services provided in misdemeanor
cases. This subsection expires June 30, 2029.
(e) The Indiana commission on court appointed attorneys may
substitute a county described in subsection (d) with a county with
similar population and geographic characteristics if the county
described in subsection (d) declines to participate in the misdemeanor
reimbursement. If a county is substituted under this subsection, the
Indiana commission on court appointed attorneys shall publish on its
website the replacement county.
(f) A request under this section from a county described in
IC 33-40-7-1(5) may be limited to expenditures for indigent defense
services provided by a particular division of a court.
(g) A county auditor shall submit quarterly to the Indiana
commission on court appointed attorneys information to be included in
the report under IC 33-40-5-4(a)(5) regarding reimbursements
requested and received from the public defense fund for the county's
expenditures for indigent defense services provided under subsections
(b), (c), and (d).
SECTION 4. IC 33-40-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 225, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this section,
"commission" means the Indiana commission on court appointed
attorneys established by IC 33-40-5-2.
(b) Except as provided under section 6 of this chapter, upon
certification by a county auditor and a determination by the
commission that the request is in compliance with the guidelines and
standards set by the commission, the commission shall quarterly
authorize an amount of reimbursement due the county or multicounty
public defender's office:
(1) that is equal to fifty percent (50%) of the county's or
multicounty public defender's office's certified expenditures for
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151


indigent defense services provided for a defendant against whom
the death sentence is sought under IC 35-50-2-9 or
IC 35-50-2-9.5; and
(2) except as provided in subsection (c), that is equal to forty
percent (40%) of the county's or multicounty public defender's
office's certified expenditures for defense services provided in
noncapital cases except misdemeanors.
The commission shall then certify to the state comptroller the amount
of reimbursement owed to a county or multicounty public defender's
office under this chapter.
(c) This subsection applies to a county that is one (1) of up to twelve
(12) counties that shall be selected by the commission based on
population and geographic diversity. Upon certification by a county
auditor and a determination by the commission that the request is in
compliance with the guidelines and standards set by the commission,
the commission may quarterly authorize an amount of reimbursement
due the county or multicounty public defender's office that is up to forty
percent (40%) of the county's or multicounty public defender's office's
certified expenditures for defense services provided in misdemeanor
cases. This subsection expires June 30, 2029.
(d) The commission may substitute a county described in subsection
(c) with a county with similar population and geographic
characteristics if the county described in subsection (c) declines to
participate in the misdemeanor reimbursement. If a county is
substituted under this subsection, the commission shall publish on its
website the replacement county.
(e) Upon receiving certification from the commission, the state
comptroller shall issue a warrant to the treasurer of state for
disbursement to the county or multicounty public defender's office of
the amount certified.
(f) The commission shall include in its report under
IC 33-40-5-4(a)(5) information regarding requested reimbursements
and amounts certified for reimbursements to each county or
multicounty public defender's office under subsections (b) and (c).
SECTION 5. IC 35-36-9-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter applies
when a defendant is charged with:
(1) a murder for which the state seeks a death sentence under
IC 35-50-2-9; or
(2) aggravated child molesting for which the state seeks a
death sentence under IC 35-50-2-9.5.
SECTION 6. IC 35-36-9-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.117-2015,
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151


SECTION 52, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. If the court determines that the defendant is an
individual with an intellectual disability under section 5 of this chapter,
the part of the state's charging instrument filed under IC 35-50-2-9(a)
or IC 35-50-2-9.5(b) that seeks a death sentence against the defendant
shall be dismissed.
SECTION 7. IC 35-50-2-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) As used in this section, "aggravated child
molesting" means child molesting involving sexual intercourse or
other sexual conduct (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5), if:
(1) the offense is committed by a person at least twenty-one
(21) years of age; and
(2) the victim is less than twelve (12) years of age.
(b) The state may seek either a death sentence or a sentence of
life imprisonment without parole for a person convicted of
aggravated child molesting. However, the state may not proceed
against a defendant under this section if a court determines at a
pretrial hearing under IC 35-36-9 that the defendant is an
individual with an intellectual disability.
(c) If the defendant was convicted of aggravated child molesting
in a jury trial, the jury shall reconvene for the sentencing hearing.
If the trial was to the court, or the judgment was entered on a
guilty plea, the court alone shall conduct the sentencing hearing.
The jury or the court may consider all the evidence introduced at
the trial stage of the proceedings, together with new evidence
presented at the sentencing hearing. The court shall instruct the
jury concerning the statutory penalties for and any other offenses
for which the defendant was convicted, the potential for
consecutive or concurrent sentencing, and the availability of
educational credit, good time credit, and clemency. The court shall
instruct the jury that, in order for the jury to recommend to the
court that the death penalty or life imprisonment without parole
should be imposed, the jury must find that the death penalty or life
imprisonment without parole is appropriate considering the nature
of the offense and the character of the defendant. The defendant
may present any additional evidence relevant to the nature of the
offense and the character of the defendant.
(d) Except as provided by IC 35-36-9, if the hearing is by jury,
the jury shall recommend to the court whether the death penalty
or life imprisonment without parole, or neither, should be imposed.
The jury may recommend:
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151


(1) the death penalty; or
(2) life imprisonment without parole;
only if it makes the findings described in subsection (k). If the jury
reaches a sentencing recommendation, the court shall sentence the
defendant accordingly. After a court pronounces sentence, a
representative of the victim's family and friends may present a
statement regarding the impact of the crime on family and friends.
The impact statement may be submitted in writing or given orally
by the representative. The statement shall be given in the presence
of the defendant.
(e) If a jury is unable to agree on a sentence recommendation
after reasonable deliberations, the court shall discharge the jury
and proceed as if the hearing had been to the court alone.
(f) If the hearing is to the court alone, except as provided by
IC 35-36-9, the court shall:
(1) sentence the defendant to death; or
(2) impose a term of life imprisonment without parole;
only if it makes the findings described in subsection (k).
(g) If a court sentences a defendant to death, the court shall
order the defendant's execution to be carried out not later than one
(1) year and one (1) day after the date the defendant was convicted.
The supreme court has exclusive jurisdiction to stay the execution
of a death sentence. If the supreme court stays the execution of a
death sentence, the supreme court shall order a new date for the
defendant's execution.
(h) If a person sentenced to death by a court files a petition for
post-conviction relief, the court, not later than ninety (90) days
after the date the petition is filed, shall set a date to hold a hearing
to consider the petition. If a court does not, within the ninety (90)
day period, set the date to hold the hearing to consider the petition,
the court's failure to set the hearing date is not a basis for
additional post-conviction relief. The attorney general shall answer
the petition for post-conviction relief on behalf of the state. At the
request of the attorney general, a prosecuting attorney shall assist
the attorney general. The court shall enter written findings of fact
and conclusions of law concerning the petition not later than ninety
(90) days after the date the hearing concludes. However, if the
court determines that the petition is without merit, the court may
dismiss the petition within ninety (90) days without conducting a
hearing under this subsection.
(i) A death sentence is subject to automatic review by the
supreme court. The review, which shall be heard under rules
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151


adopted by the supreme court, shall be given priority over all other
cases. The supreme court's review must take into consideration all
claims that the:
(1) conviction or sentence was in violation of the:
(A) Constitution of the State of Indiana; or
(B) Constitution of the United States;
(2) sentencing court was without jurisdiction to impose a
sentence; and
(3) sentence:
(A) exceeds the maximum sentence authorized by law; or
(B) is otherwise erroneous.
If the supreme court cannot complete its review by the date set by
the sentencing court for the defendant's execution under subsection
(g), the supreme court shall stay the execution of the death sentence
and set a new date to carry out the defendant's execution.
(j) A person who has been sentenced to death and who has
completed state post-conviction review proceedings may file a
written petition with the supreme court seeking to present new
evidence challenging the person's guilt or the appropriateness of
the death sentence if the person serves notice on the attorney
general. The supreme court shall determine, with or without a
hearing, whether the person has presented previously undiscovered
evidence that undermines confidence in the conviction or the death
sentence. If necessary, the supreme court may remand the case to
the trial court for an evidentiary hearing to consider the new
evidence and its effect on the person's conviction and death
sentence. The supreme court may not make a determination in the
person's favor nor make a decision to remand the case to the trial
court for an evidentiary hearing without first providing the
attorney general with an opportunity to be heard on the matter.
(k) Before a sentence may be imposed under this section, the
jury, in a proceeding under subsection (d), or the court, in a
proceeding under subsection (f), must find that any mitigating
circumstances that exist are outweighed by the nature of the
offense and the character of the defendant.
2026 IN 1312—LS 6997/DI 151